District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.26

Injunctions.

(a)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia, to enjoin any violation of this chapter.

(b)

The remedy established by this section shall be in addition to criminal sanctions, civil sanctions, and disciplinary action initiated by the Mayor.

(c)

In any proceeding brought pursuant to this section, it shall not be necessary to prove that any person has been injured by the violation alleged.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 27, 56 DCR 1167